Arkansas, session 2025, HB1709.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-76-112 is amended to read as follows:
20-76-112. Human Services Workers and Mental Health Counselors in the
Schools Program.
(a)(1) The Human Services Workers and Mental Health Counselors in the
Schools Program is established as a collaborative effort among the Division
of Children and Family Services, the Arkansas Workforce Development Board,
the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, and local school
districts.
(2) The Human Services Workers and Mental Health Counselors in
the Schools Program is designed to help children and families by:
(1)(A) Promoting safety of children and strengthening of
families;
(2)(B) Supporting the community's capacity to produce children
who are healthy, children who are in supportive, nurturing, and healthy
*JMB485*
03/05/2025 12:52:06 PM JMB485

HB1709
families, and children who succeed in school; and
(3)(C) Promoting the Division of Children and Family Services'
family preservation philosophy and family-centered practice.
(b) Upon approval of the board, the Division of Children and Family
Services shall enter into contracts with local school districts to provide
funding for the maximum number of human services workers and mental health
counselors.
(c)(1) A human services worker shall have a bachelor's degree or a
master's degree in social work or a related field.
(2) A mental health counselor shall have a bachelor's degree or
a master's degree in the mental health or counseling field.
(3) A human services worker or mental health counselor and shall
provide the following services according to skills and training:
(1)(A) Crisis intervention;
(2)(B) School conferences and in-service training;
(3)(C) Home visits;
(4)(D) Transportation for family and student group counseling;
(5)(E) Parent training and activities;
(6)(F) Supportive service referrals;
(7)(G) Individualized coping and conflict management skills; and
(8)(H) Assessment of family and student needs.
(d)(1) Funding for human services workers and mental health counselors
shall be targeted to schools with eighty percent (80%) or more of their
children eligible for the Free and Reduced Lunch Program under the National
School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq.
(2) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education and the
Division of Children and Family Services shall develop criteria to prioritize
eligibility for the Human Services Workers and Mental Health Counselors in
the Schools Program.
(e) The Coordinated Health Services Section of the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education shall evaluate the Human Services Workers
and Mental Health Counselors in the Schools Program annually in coordination
with the Division of Children and Family Services, the board, and the local
school districts that hold contracts.
(f) A parent or a student has the option to refuse any services
recommended under the Human Services Workers and Mental Health Counselors in
03/05/2025 12:52:06 PM JMB485

HB1709
the Schools Program.



































03/05/2025 12:52:06 PM JMB485